Nevada, session 83, AB256.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. The Legislative Commission shall appoint a
Regional Rail Transit Advisory Working Group to conduct a study
during the 2025-2026 interim concerning the development of
regional rail transit in regional communities across the State.
2. The Advisory Working Group must be composed of the
following voting members appointed by the Legislative
Commission:
(a) One member who represents a labor union representing rail
or public transit employees in Clark County;
(b) One member who represents a labor union representing rail
or public transit employees in Washoe County;
(c) One member who represents the Regional Transportation
Commission of Southern Nevada;
(d) One member who represents the Regional Transportation
Commission of Washoe County;
(e) One member who represents a chamber of commerce or
trade association;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(f) Two members who are Legislators;
(g) One member who represents Clark County or another local
government in Clark County;
(h) One member who represents Washoe County or another
local government in Washoe County;
(i) One member who is a resident of Clark County who has an
interest or expertise in rail transit;
(j) One member who is a resident of Washoe County who has an
interest or expertise in rail transit;
(k) One member who is a resident of a county other than Clark
County or Washoe County, who has an interest or expertise in rail
transit; and
(l) One member who represents a county other than Clark
County or Washoe County or a local government in such a county
other than Clark County or Washoe County or who is a
representative of an organization representing multiple such
counties.
3. In addition to the members appointed pursuant to subsection
2, the Legislative Commission may appoint any other nonvoting
members to advise or assist the Advisory Working Group.
4. During the 2025-2026 interim, the Advisory Working Group
shall study:
(a) The current state of regional rail and public transit in
regional communities across the State, including, without limitation,
any current or future rail or public transit projects that are currently
in the planning stages or under development;
(b) The need for regional rail transit in regional communities
across the State;
(c) Potential sources of federal, state, private or nonprofit money
to support the development of regional rail transit in regional
communities across the State; and
(d) Any public or private entities which should be involved or
oversee the planning, development and implementation of regional
rail transit in regional communities across the State.
5. The Advisory Working Group shall, at its first meeting, elect
a Chair and Vice Chair from among its voting members.
6. The Advisory Working Group shall meet at the call of the
Chair at least once each month. A majority of the Advisory Working
Group constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, and a
majority of those voting members present at any meeting is
sufficient for any official action taken by the Advisory Working
Group.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
7. The members of the Advisory Working Group serve without
compensation and are not entitled to the per diem and travel
expenses provided for state officers and employees generally.
8. On or before July 1, 2026, the Advisory Working Group
shall prepare and submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Growth and Infrastructure:
(a) An actionable plan to develop regional rail transit in regional
communities across the State; and
(b) A written report describing the findings and
recommendations of the Advisory Working Group, including any
recommendations for legislation.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)